Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB969.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part I of Title 24 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 14EDUCATIONAL FREEDOM FOR FAMILIES PROGRAMSec.1401. Scope of chapter.1402. Definitions.1403. Establishment.1404. Funding.1405. Administration and oversight.1406. Charter and cyber charter school expansion.1407. Homeschooling support.1408. STEM program enhancements.1234567891011121314151617181920 1409. Teacher performance incentives.§ 1401. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the Educational Freedom for Families Program.§ 1402. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." A student education savings account established by the department for an eligible student under this chapter to provide for qualified educational expenses."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Eligible student." A resident of this Commonwealth who:(1) is eligible to enroll in kindergarten through grade 12 under 22 Pa. Code § 11.12 (relating to school age);(2) is enrolled in or eligible to attend a public school in this Commonwealth under section 1301 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949;(3) resides in a household with income that meets the eligibility criteria for scholarship assistance under Article XX-B of the Public School Code of 1949; and(4) resides within the attendance boundary of a school performing in the bottom 15% of Statewide academic performance metrics, as determined annually by the department."Parent." A parent, guardian or other person with legal authority to act on behalf of an eligible student."Qualified educational expenses." Expenses approved by the 20250SB0969PN1109 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department, including:(1) Tuition and fees at a participating private school.(2) Fees for standardized assessments.(3) Curriculum and instructional materials.(4) Tutoring or educational therapies.(5) Costs associated with homeschooling under section 1327.1 of the Public School Code of 1949.(6) Online learning programs and cyber charter school enrollment.(7) Transportation to and from educational providers.(8) Educational technology.§ 1403. Establishment.The Educational Freedom for Families Program is established within the department to:(1) Provide access to education savings accounts for eligible students.(2) Increase flexibility for parents in determining appropriate educational options.(3) Improve educational outcomes and equity across school districts.§ 1404. Funding.(a) Annual appropriation.--Each fiscal year, money shall be appropriated from the General Fund to the department in an amount not less than the average per-pupil State subsidy for basic education funding, as calculated by the most recent data published by the department.(b) Education savings accounts.--(1) The department shall establish and maintain, in conjunction with the State Treasurer, a student education savings account in the State Treasury for each eligible 20250SB0969PN1109 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 student under this chapter.(2) Money shall be deposited in an account on a quarterly basis.(3) The total amount deposited annually in an account shall reflect the average State per-pupil subsidy and shall follow the student, rather than the school entity, in which the student would otherwise be enrolled.(c) Portability.--Money deposited in an account shall be portable and may be used for qualified educational expenses, regardless of the educational provider, subject to department approval.(d) Misuse and audit.--Misappropriation or use of funds for noneducational purposes shall result in suspension or termination of the account, and may include clawback provisions and referral to law enforcement, if fraud is determined.§ 1405. Administration and oversight.(a) Duties of department.--The department shall:(1) Establish rules and guidelines for the use of accounts.(2) Maintain a list of participating providers and approved vendors.(3) Conduct annual audits of account usage.(4) Ensure compliance with Federal and State nondiscrimination laws.(b) Reports.--Parents of an eligible student with an account shall submit an annual education report, including attendance records and student progress evaluations, to the department.§ 1406. Charter and cyber charter school expansion.(a) Application process.--The department shall streamline the application and renewal process for charter and cyber 20250SB0969PN1109 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 charter schools under Article XVII-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(b) Priorities.--Priority shall be given to charter applications serving underserved or underperforming communities.§ 1407. Homeschooling support.(a) Resources.--The department shall make instructional materials, technology resources and grant funding available to home education programs registered under section 1327.1 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(b) Unlawful infringement.--No regulation under this chapter shall alter or infringe upon the autonomy of lawful home education programs.§ 1408. STEM program enhancements.(a) Grant allocation.--The department shall allocate grants for the integration of Science, Technology, Engineering and Mathematics curriculum in public schools ranked in the lowest 20% Statewide.(b) Utilization.--Grants may be used for teacher training, laboratory equipment and student research initiatives.§ 1409. Teacher performance incentives.(a) Establishment of fund.--The Teacher Excellence Incentive Fund is established in the State Treasury and shall be funded annually by appropriations from:(1) unspent or reclaimed account moneys from dormant or misused accounts;(2) private donations and grants;(3) Federal education reform funds, where applicable; and(4) other sources as authorized by law.20250SB0969PN1109 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Performance measures.--The department shall use the money in the fund to provide salary supplements, bonuses or student loan forgiveness and shall be based on objective improvements in:(1) PSSA, SAT, ACT scores;(2) year-over-year student growth;(3) schoolwide average grade point average increases; and(4) improved graduation rates or college admission rates.(c) Implementation.--The department shall publish annual eligibility criteria for incentives and provide application procedures for teachers or schools seeking performance recognition. Data shall be verified using standardized reporting protocols established by the department.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20250SB0969PN1109 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617